Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF690.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [62Q.474] MANAGEMENT AND TREATMENT OF OBESITY. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the terms defined in this subdivision have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Intensive health behavior and lifestyle treatment" means an evidence-based, intensive, multicomponent behavioral or lifestyle modification intervention that supports healthy weight management and is delivered in-person or through telehealth, as defined in section 62A.673. new text end new text begin (c) "FDA-approved obesity medication" means any medication approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration (FDA) with an indication for chronic weight management in patients with an obesity diagnosis. new text end new text begin (d) "Metabolic and bariatric surgery" means any surgical intervention included in the most current American Society for Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery and International Federation for the Surgery of Obesity and Metabolic Disorders Guidelines on Indications for Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Management and treatment of obesity; coverage required. new text end new text begin (a) A health plan must include coverage to diagnose and treat the chronic disease of obesity, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) intensive health behavioral and lifestyle treatment; new text end new text begin (2) metabolic and bariatric surgery; and new text end new text begin (3) FDA-approved obesity medication. new text end new text begin (b) Coverage criteria for FDA-approved obesity medications must not be more restrictive than the FDA-approved indications for FDA-approved obesity medications. new text end new text begin (c) Coverage under this section must not be different or separate from coverage for any other illness, condition, or disorder for purposes of determining deductibles, co-payment and coinsurance factors, benefit year maximums for deductibles and co-payment, and coinsurance. new text end new text begin (d) This section does not prohibit a plan from applying utilization management to determine the medical necessity for chronic disease of obesity treatment under this section if the appropriateness and medical necessity determinations are made in the same manner as appropriateness and medical necessity determinations are made to treat any other illness, condition, or disorder covered by a contract. new text end new text begin (e) Intensive health behavior and lifestyle treatment may include interventions certified by or recognized by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention or recommended by current clinical standards of care. The services may be provided in office, virtual, or community-based settings to support patient access and needs. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, and applies to health plans offered, issued, or renewed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0625, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 77. new text end new text begin Management and treatment of obesity. new text end new text begin Medical assistance covers obesity management and treatment. Medical assistance must meet the same requirements that apply to a health plan under section 62Q.474. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. new text end